Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-7007
Health carrier; primary verification; secondary verification; duties.

A health carrier shall:

(1) Obtain primary verification of at least the following information about the applicant:

(a) Current license, certificate, or registration to practice a health care profession in this state and history of licensure, certification, or registration;

(b) Current level of professional liability coverage, if applicable;

(c) Status of hospital privileges, if applicable;

(d) Specialty board certification status, if applicable;

(e) Current federal Drug Enforcement Agency registration certificate, if applicable;

(f) Graduation from a health care professional school; and

(g) Completion of postgraduate training, if applicable;

(2) Obtain, subject to either primary or secondary verification at the health carrier's discretion:

(a) The health care professional's licensure, certification, or registration history in this and all other states;

(b) The health care professional's malpractice history; and

(c) The health care professional's practice history;

(3) At least every three years obtain primary verification of a participating health care professional's:

(a) Current license, certificate, or registration to practice a health care profession in this state;

(b) Current level of professional liability coverage, if applicable;

(c) Status of hospital privileges, if applicable;

(d) Current federal Drug Enforcement Agency registration certificate, if applicable; and

(e) Specialty board certification status, if applicable; and

(4) Require all participating providers to notify the health carrier of changes in the status of any of the items listed in this section at any time and identify for participating providers the individual to whom they should report changes in the status of an item listed in this section.

Laws 1998, LB 1162, § 32.